csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_V.yaml
     niimi+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+NA: niimiikan
     niimi+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+NA: niimiikeg
     niimi+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+NA: niimiikang
     nagamo+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+NA: nagamookan
     nagamo+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+NA: nagamookeg
     nagamo+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+NA: nagamookang
     niimi+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+NA: niimiken
     niimi+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+NA: niimikegon
     niimi+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+NA: niimisiidaa
     nagamo+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+NA: nagamoken
     nagamo+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+NA: nagamokegon
     nagamo+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+NA: nagamosiidaa
     niimi+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+NA: niimin
     niimi+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+NA: [niimig,niimik]
     niimi+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+NA: niimidaa
     nagamo+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+NA: nagamon
     nagamo+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+NA: [nagamog,nagamok]
     nagamo+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+NA: nagamodaa
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: niniimisiinaadog
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: ninagamosiinaadog
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: giniimisiimwaadog
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: ginagamosiimwaadog
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: giniimisiinaadog
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: ginagamosiinaadog
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [niimisiidogena',niimisiidogenan]
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [nagamosiidogena',nagamosiidogenan]
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: niimisiidogenag
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: nagamosiidogenag
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: niimisiidogenan
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: nagamosiidogenan
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: niimisiidog
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: nagamosiidog
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: niniimisiiminaadog
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: ninagamosiiminaadog
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: giniimisiiminaadog
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: ginagamosiiminaadog
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+NA: niimisiimwaadog
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+NA: nagamosiimwaadog
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: niniiminaadog
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: ninagamonaadog
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: giniimimwaadog
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: ginagamomwaadog
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: giniiminaadog
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: ginagamonaadog
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [niimidogena',niimiwidogenan]
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [nagamodogena',nagamowidogenan]
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: [niimiwidogenag,niimidogenag]
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: [nagamowidogenag,nagamodogenag]
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: [niimiwidogenan,niimidogenan]
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: [nagamowidogenan,nagamodogenan]
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: [niimiwidog,niimidog]
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: [nagamowidog,nagamodog]
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: niniimiminaadog
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: ninagamominaadog
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: giniimiminaadog
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: ginagamominaadog
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+NA: niimimwaadog
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+NA: nagamomwaadog
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: niimisiigwaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: nagamosiigwaaban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: niimisiinigoban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: nagamosiinigoban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: niimisiigoban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: nagamosiigoban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: niimigwaaan
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: nagamogwaaban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: niiminigoban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: nagamonigoban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: niimigoban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: nagamogoban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: [niniimisii,niniimisiin]
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: [ninagamosii,ninagamosiin]
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: giniimisiim
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: ginagamosiim
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: [giniimisii,giniimisiin]
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: [ginagamosii,ginagamosiin]
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [niimisiiwa',niimisiiwan]
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [nagamosiiwa',nagamosiiwan]
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: niimisiiwag
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: nagamosiiwag
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: niimisiiwan
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: nagamosiiwan
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: [niimisii,niimisiin]
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: [nagamosii,nagamosiin]
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: niniimisiimin
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: ninagamosiimin
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: giniimisiimin
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: ginagamosiimin
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+NA: niimisiim
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+NA: nagamosiim
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: niniim
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: ninagam
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: giniimim
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: ginagamom
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: giniim
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: ginagam
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [niimiwa',niimiwan]
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [nagamowa',nagamowan]
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: niimiwag
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: nagamowag
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: niimiwan
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: nagamowan
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: niimi
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: nagamo
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: niniimimin
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: ninagamomin
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: giniimimin
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: ginagamomin
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+NA: niimim
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+NA: nagamom
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: niniimisiinaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: ninagamosiinaaban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: giniimisiimwaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: ginagamosiimwaaban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: giniimisiinaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: ginagamosiinaaban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [niimisiibanii',niimisiibaniin]
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [nagamosiibanii',nagamosiibaniin]
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: niimisiibaniig
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: nagamosiibaniig
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: niimisiibaniin
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: nagamosiibaniin
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: niimisiiban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: nagamosiiban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: niniimisiiminaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: ninagamosiiminaaban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: giniimisiiminaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: ginagamosiiminaaban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+NA: niimisiimwaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+NA: nagamosiimwaaban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: niniiminaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: ninagamonaaban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: giniimimwaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: ginagamomwaaban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: giniiminaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: ginagamonaaban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [niimiibanii',niimiibaniin]
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [nagamoobanii',nagamoobaniin]
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: niimiibaniig
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: nagamoobaniig
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: niimiibaniin
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: nagamoobaniin
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: niimiiban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: nagamooban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: niniimiminaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: ninagamominaaban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: giniimiminaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: ginagamominaaban
     niimi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+NA: niimimwaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+NA: nagamomwaaban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: niimisiiwaanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: niimisiiwegwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: niimisiiwanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: niimisiinigwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: niimisiiwaagwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: niimisiinigwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: niimisiigwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: niimisiiwaangen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: niimisiiwangen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+NA: niimisiiwiingen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: nagamosiiwaanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: nagamosiiwegwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: nagamosiiwanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: nagamosiinigwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: nagamosiiwaagwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: nagamosiinigwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: nagamosiigwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: nagamosiiwaangen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: nagamosiiwangen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+NA: nagamosiiwiingen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: niimiwaanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: niimiwegwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: niimiwanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: niiminigwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: niimiwaagwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: niiminigwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: niimigwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: niimiwaangen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: niimiwangen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+NA: niimiwiingen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: nagamowaanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: nagamowegwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: nagamowanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: nagamonigwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: nagamowaagwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: nagamonigwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: nagamogwen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: nagamowaangen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: nagamowangen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+NA: nagamowiingen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: niimisiiwaambaanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: niimisiiwegibanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: niimisiiwambanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: niimisiinigobanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: niimisiiwaagobanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: niimisiinigobanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: niimisiigobanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: niimisiiwaangibanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: niimisiiwangibanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: niimisiiwiingibanen
     nagamo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: nagamosiiwaambaanen
